Arkansas, session 2025, HB1830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-16-714(f)-(i), concerning the
procurement of contingency fee contracts, are amended to read as follows:
(f) A contingency fee shall not be based on penalties or civil fines
awarded or any amounts attributable to penalties or civil fines.
(g) The Attorney General shall not enter into a contingency fee
contract unless the following requirements are met throughout the contract
period and any extensions of the contract period:
(1) The government attorneys shall retain complete control over
the course and conduct of the case;
(2) A government attorney with supervisory authority shall be
personally involved in overseeing the litigation;
(3) The government attorneys shall retain the authority to reject
any decisions made by outside counsel;
(4) A defendant that is the subject of the litigation may contact
*LGL167*
03/18/2025 1:39:42 PM LGL167

HB1830
the lead government attorneys directly without having to confer with
contingency fee counsel;
(5) A government attorney with supervisory authority for the case
shall attend all settlement conferences; and
(6) Decisions regarding settlement of the case shall be left
exclusively to the discretion of the government attorneys and the Attorney
General.
(h)(g) The Attorney General shall develop a standard addendum to each
contingency fee contract that shall be used in all cases and shall describe
in detail the responsibilities of the contracted private attorney and the
Attorney General, including without limitation the requirements under
subsection (g)(f) of this section.
(i)(h) This section does not expand the authority of the Attorney
General to enter into a contract that the Attorney General does not otherwise
have the authority to execute.





















03/18/2025 1:39:42 PM LGL167